Florida, session 2026, SB108.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 29 30 Section 1.âSection 627.7015, Florida Statutes, is amended 31 to read: 32 627.7015âMandatory mediation Alternative procedure for 33 resolution of disputed property insurance claims.â 34 (1)âThis section sets forth a nonadversarial alternative 35 dispute resolution procedure for a mediated claim resolution 36 conference prompted by the need for effective, fair, and timely 37 handling of property insurance claims. There is a particular 38 need for an informal, nonthreatening forum for helping parties 39 who elect this procedure to resolve their claims disputes 40 because most homeowner and commercial residential insurance 41 policies obligate policyholders to participate in a potentially 42 expensive and time-consuming adversarial appraisal process 43 before litigation. The procedure set forth in this section is 44 designed to bring the parties together for a mediated claims 45 settlement conference without any of the trappings or drawbacks 46 of an adversarial process. Before participating in resorting to 47 these procedures, policyholders and insurers are encouraged to 48 resolve claims as quickly and fairly as possible. This section 49 applies is available with respect to claims under personal lines 50 and commercial residential policies before commencing the 51 appraisal process and is a condition precedent to, or before 52 commencing litigation. Mediation may be requested only by the 53 policyholder, as a first-party claimant, a third-party, as an 54 assignee of the policy benefits, or the insurer. However, An 55 insurer is not required to participate in any mediation 56 requested by a third-party assignee of the policy benefits. If 57 requested by the policyholder, Participation by legal counsel is 58 permitted. Mediation under this section is also required of 59 available to litigants referred to the department by a county 60 court or circuit court. This section does not apply to 61 commercial coverages, to private passenger motor vehicle 62 insurance coverages, or to disputes relating to liability 63 coverages in policies of property insurance. 64 (2)âAt the time of issuance and renewal of a policy or at 65 the time a first-party claim within the scope of this section is 66 filed by the policyholder, the insurer shall notify the 67 policyholder of its right to participate in the mandatory 68 mediation program under this section. A claim becomes eligible 69 for mediation after the insurer complies with s. 627.70131(7) or 70 elects to reinspect pursuant to s. 627.70152(4)(a)3. If the 71 insurer has not complied with s. 627.70131(7) or elected to 72 reinspect pursuant to s. 627.70152(4)(a)3. within 90 days after 73 notice of the loss, the insurer may not require mediation under 74 this section. This subsection does not impair the right of an 75 insurance company to request mediation after a determination of 76 coverage pursuant to this section or require appraisal or 77 another method of alternative dispute resolution pursuant to s. 78 627.70152(4)(b). The department shall prepare a consumer 79 information pamphlet for distribution to persons participating 80 in mediation. 81 (3)âIf the parties mutually agree, mediation may be 82 conducted by teleconference or other electronic means in lieu of 83 appearing in person. All named insureds, or their 84 representatives, must attend the mediation, regardless of how it 85 is conducted. The costs of mediation must be reasonable, and the 86 insurer must bear all of the cost of conducting mediation 87 conferences, except as otherwise provided in this section. If a 88 named insured or his or her representative policyholder fails to 89 appear at the conference, thus preventing the mediation from 90 proceeding, the conference must be rescheduled upon the 91 policyholderâs payment of the costs of a rescheduled conference. 92 If the insurer fails to appear at the conference, the insurer 93 must pay the policyholderâs actual cash expenses incurred in 94 attending the conference if the insurerâs failure to attend was 95 not due to a good cause acceptable to the department. An insurer 96 is will be deemed to have failed to appear if the insurerâs 97 representative lacks authority to settle the full value of the 98 claim. The insurer shall incur an additional fee for a 99 rescheduled conference necessitated by the insurerâs failure to 100 appear at a scheduled conference. The fees assessed by the 101 department must include a charge necessary to defray the 102 expenses of the department related to its duties under this 103 section and must be deposited in the Insurance Regulatory Trust 104 Fund. The department may suspend the insurerâs authority to 105 appoint licensees if the insurer does not timely pay the 106 required fees. If a party elects to request an expert or a 107 representative to attend the mediation, that party must bear any 108 costs for the attendance of the expert or representative. 109 (4)âThe department shall adopt by rule a property insurance 110 mediation program to be administered by the department or its 111 designee. The department shall may also adopt special rules that 112 which are applicable in cases of an emergency within this the 113 state, including emergency rules as necessary to establish 114 physical addresses for the mediation program in areas affected 115 by natural disasters. The rules shall be modeled after practices 116 and procedures set forth in mediation rules of procedure adopted 117 by the Supreme Court. The rules shall provide for all of the 118 following: 119 (a)âReasonable requirements requirement for processing and 120 scheduling of requests for mediation. 121 (b)âQualifications for persons who apply to be mediators, 122 grounds for denial of applications application, revocation of 123 the departmentâs approval of mediators, and grounds for 124 suspension, revocation of approval, and other penalties for 125 mediators, as provided in s. 627.745 and the Florida Rules for 126 Certified and Court-Appointed Mediators. 127 (c)âProvisions governing who may attend mediation 128 conferences. 129 (d)âSelection of mediators. 130 (e)âCriteria for the conduct of mediation conferences. 131 (f)âRight to legal counsel. 132 (5)(a)âAll statements made and documents produced at a 133 mediation conference shall be deemed to be settlement 134 negotiations in anticipation of litigation within the scope of 135 s. 90.408. All parties to the mediation must negotiate in good 136 faith and must have the authority to immediately settle the 137 claim. Mediators are deemed to be agents of the department and 138 shall have the immunity from suit provided in s. 44.107. 139 (b)âWithin 10 days after mediation is invoked, the 140 policyholder must provide to the insurer any information and 141 supporting documents that serve as the basis for the claim. 142 (6)(a)âMediation is nonbinding; however, if a written 143 settlement is reached and the policyholder is not represented by 144 an attorney or a public adjuster, the policyholder has 3 145 business days within which the policyholder may rescind the 146 settlement unless the policyholder has cashed or deposited any 147 check or draft disbursed to the policyholder for the disputed 148 matters as a result of the conference. If a settlement agreement 149 is reached and is not rescinded, it is binding and acts as a 150 release of all specific claims that were presented in that 151 mediation conference. 152 (b)âAt the conclusion of the mediation, the mediator shall 153 provide a written report of the results of mediation, including 154 any settlement amount, to the insurer, the policyholder, and the 155 policyholderâs representative if the policyholder is represented 156 at the mediation. 157 (7)âIf the insurer fails to comply with subsection (2) by 158 failing to notify a policyholder of its right to participate in 159 the mandatory mediation program under this section or if the 160 insurer requests the mediation, and the mediation results are 161 rejected by either party, the policyholder is not required to 162 submit to or participate in any contractual loss appraisal 163 process of the property loss damage as a precondition to legal 164 action for breach of contract against the insurer for its 165 failure to pay the policyholderâs claims covered by the policy. 166 (8)âThe department may designate an entity or person to 167 serve as administrator to carry out any of the provisions of 168 this section and may take this action by means of a written 169 contract or agreement. 170 (9)âFor purposes of this section, the term âclaimâ refers 171 to any dispute between an insurer and a policyholder relating to 172 a material issue of fact other than a dispute: 173 (a)âWith respect to which the insurer has a reasonable 174 basis to suspect fraud; 175 (b)âWhen the insurer has determined, based on agreed-upon 176 facts as to the cause of loss, there is no coverage under the 177 policy; 178 (c)âWith respect to which the insurer has a reasonable 179 basis to believe that the policyholder has intentionally made a 180 material misrepresentation of fact which is relevant to the 181 claim, and the entire request for payment of a loss has been 182 denied on the basis of the material misrepresentation; 183 (d)âWith respect to which the amount in controversy is less 184 than $500, unless the parties agree to mediate a dispute 185 involving a lesser amount; or 186 (e)âWith respect to a loss that does not comply with s. 187 627.70132. 188 (10)âParticipation in mediation under this section before 189 the policyholderâs filing of a notice under s. 627.70152 does 190 not prohibit or waive an insurerâs right to invoke and 191 participate in mediation under this section in response to the 192 notice. 193 Section 2.âSubsection (3) of section 627.7074, Florida 194 Statutes, is amended to read: 195 627.7074âAlternative procedure for resolution of disputed 196 sinkhole insurance claims.â 197 (3)âIf there is coverage available under the policy and the 198 claim was submitted within the timeframe provided in s. 199 627.706(5), following the receipt of the report provided under 200 s. 627.7073 or the denial of a claim for a sinkhole loss, the 201 insurer shall notify the policyholder of his or her right to 202 participate in the neutral evaluation program under this 203 section. Neutral evaluation supersedes the mediation alternative 204 dispute resolution process under s. 627.7015 but does not 205 invalidate the appraisal clause of the insurance policy. The 206 insurer shall provide to the policyholder the consumer 207 information pamphlet prepared by the department pursuant to 208 subsection (1) electronically or by United States mail. 209 Section 3.âEffective July 1, 2026, for the 2026-2027 fiscal 210 year, the sum of $1 million in recurring funds is appropriated 211 from the Insurance Regulatory Trust Fund to the Department of 212 Financial Services for the purpose of administering the 213 amendment made by this act to s. 627.7015, Florida Statutes. 214 Section 4.âExcept as otherwise expressly provided in this 215 act and except for this section, which shall take effect July 1, 216 2026, this act shall take effect January 1, 2027.